modules/braille/libhyphen-utils/src/main/resources/tables/hyph_no_NO.dic
.vas9standshøgd./ss=s,3,2
.vasstands1h
.vasstands5hø
.vasstandshø2g1
.vasstandshø8g1d
.vas9standshøgda./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandshøg1da
.vas9standshøgdene./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandshøg1de
.vasstandshøgde1ne
.vas9standshøgder./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandshøgd2er
.vas9standshøgdi./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandshøg1di
.vas9standsmer1ka./ss=s,3,2
.vasstands1m
.vasstands1me
.vasstandsm4erka
.vasstandsme4r1k
.vas9standsmer3ke./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandsm8er1ke
.vas9standsmerkene./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandsmer3ke3ne
.vas9standsmerker./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsmer9ket./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsmerki./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandsmer3ki
.vas9standsmål6er./ss=s,3,2
.vasstands1må
.vasstandsm6ål
.vasstandsmå1le
.vas9standsmåle9re./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandsmål8e1re
.vas9standsmåleren./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsmåler8er./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandsmåle1rer
.vas9standsmåler3ne./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandsmål2e2rn
.vasstandsmåler1ne
.vas9s6toff./ss=s,3,2
.vas1s2tof
.vassto2ff
.vas9stof7fa./ss=s,3,2
.vasstof1fa
.vas9stoffene./ss=s,3,2
.vasstof1fe
.vasstoffe1ne
.vas9stof5fer./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoffet./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoffi./ss=s,3,2
.vasstof1fi
.vas9stoffperoksid./ss=s,3,2
.vasstof2f3p2
.vasstoff1pe
.vasstoff4p2ero
.vasstoffper5o4k7s
.vasstoffperok5s4i
.vas9stoffperoksida./ss=s,3,2
.vasstoffperok3s2i7da
.vas9stoffperoksidene./ss=s,3,2
.vasstoffperok3s2i3den
.vasstoffperoksi1de
.vasstoffperokside1ne
.vas9stoffperoksi5der./ss=s,3,2
.vasstoffperoks4id2er
.vas9stoffperoksid2et./ss=s,3,2
.vas9straum./ss=s,3,2
.vas4st6r4
.vas5s4traum
.vas9straumen./ss=s,3,2
.vasstrau9men
.vasstra2u1me
.vas9strimer./ss=s,3,2
.vasstri1me
.vas9strøm./ss=s,3,2
.vas1s2trø
.vass4t6rø2m
.vas9strømmen./ss=s,3,2
.vasstrø2m1m4
.vasstrøm1me
.vas9strømmene./ss=s,3,2
.vasstrømme1ne
.vas9strømmer./ss=s,3,2
.vas9strå3lane./ss=s,3,2
.vass4trå
.vasst4rål
.vasstrå1la
.vasstrål6a3ne
.vas9strå1l8ar./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stråle./ss=s,3,2
.vasstrå1le
.vas9strålen./ss=s,3,2
.vas9strålene./ss=s,3,2
.vasstråle1ne
.vas9strålens./ss=s,3,2
.vasstråle6ns
.vas9strål6er./ss=s,3,2
.vas9styremakt./ss=s,3,2
.vas1sty
.vas3s4tyr
.vassty2rem
.vasstyre1ma
.vasstyrema6k1t
.vas9styremak1ta./ss=s,3,2
.vas9styremaktene./ss=s,3,2
.vasstyremak1te
.vasstyremakte1ne
.vas9styremak9ter./ss=s,3,2
.vas9styresmakt./ss=s,3,2
.vassty1res1m
.vasstyres1ma
.vasstyresma6k1t
.vas9styresmak1ta./ss=s,3,2
.vas9styresmaktene./ss=s,3,2
.vasstyresmak1te
.vasstyresmakte1ne
.vas9styresmak9ter./ss=s,3,2
.vas9syk./ss=s,3,2
.vas1sy
.vass6yk
.vas9syke./ss=s,3,2
.vassy2ke
.vas9syke1re./ss=s,3,2
.vassy4ker
.vassy5ke1re
.vas9sy5ke6st./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sy5ke6s5te./ss=s,3,2
.vassykes1te
.vas9sykt./ss=s,3,2
.vassy6k1t
.vas9søl./ss=s,3,2
.vas6s7ø
.vas3s4øl
.vas9sø4la./ss=s,3,2
.vassø1la
.vas9sø4le./ss=s,3,2
.vassø1le
.vas9sølene./ss=s,3,2
.vassøle1ne
.vas9søl6er./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sø3let./ss=s,3,2
.vassø5let
.vas9søli./ss=s,3,2
.vassø1li
.vas9sølone./ss=s,3,2
.vassø1lo
.vassølo5ne
.vassøl2on
.vas9søl4or./ss=s,3,2
.vas9søy1la./ss=s,3,2
.vas3s2øyl
.vassøy1la
.vas9søyle./ss=s,3,2
.vassøy1le
.vas9søylen./ss=s,3,2
.vas9søylene./ss=s,3,2
.vassøyle1ne
.vas9søyl6er./ss=s,3,2
.vas9søylone./ss=s,3,2
.vassøylo5ne
.vassøyl2on
.vas9søyl4or./ss=s,3,2
.vat9teppa./tt=t,3,2
.va6tt
.vat1te
.vat2t2e1p
.vatte2pp
.vattep1pa
.vat9teppe./tt=t,3,2
.vattep1pe
.vat9teppene./tt=t,3,2
.vatteppe1ne
.vat9tepper./tt=t,3,2
.vat9teppet./tt=t,3,2
.vat9teppets./tt=t,3,2
.vatteppe4t1s6
.vat9teppi./tt=t,3,2
.vattep1pi
.vek9kvar1vo./kk=k,3,2
.v2e2kk
.vekk1v2
.vekkva2r1v
.vil9laks./ll=l,3,2
.vi2l1l
.vil2lak
.villa4ks
.vil9laks2en./ll=l,3,2
.villak1se
.vil9laksene./ll=l,3,2
.villaks2e1ne
.vil9laksens./ll=l,3,2
.villaks2e6ns
.vil9lak5s2er./ll=l,3,2
.vil9laksstamme./ll=l,3,2
.villak2s1s2
.villakss2t
.villaks3sta2m1m4
.villaksstam1me
.vil9laksstammen./ll=l,3,2
.vil9laksstammene./ll=l,3,2
.villaksstamme1ne
.vil9laksstammer./ll=l,3,2
.vil9led./ll=l,3,2
.vil4led
.vil1le
.vil9le8da./ll=l,3,2
.vil2le1da
.vil9le6de./ll=l,3,2
.ville1de
.vil9le7de3de./ll=l,3,2
.villede1de
.vil9ledel3se./ll=l,3,2
.villed4e2l1s
.villedel3se
.vil9ledels2en./ll=l,3,2
.villedel3sen
.vil9ledelsens./ll=l,3,2
.villedels2e6ns
.vil9leden3de./ll=l,3,2
.villede6nd
.villeden1de
.vil9leder./ll=l,3,2
.ville5d2er
.vil9lede1re./ll=l,3,2
.villede1re
.vil9lederen./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leder8er./ll=l,3,2
.villede1rer
.vil9leder3ne./ll=l,3,2
.villeder5ne
.villed2e2rn
.vil9le3d2es./ll=l,3,2
.ville3de1s
.vil9led2et./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledete./ll=l,3,2
.villed2e3te
.vil9ledning./ll=l,3,2
.ville8d1n
.villed1ni
.villedni2ng
.vil9lednin3gen./ll=l,3,2
.villednin3g2en
.villednin1ge
.vil9ledningene./ll=l,3,2
.villednin7ge1ne
.vil9ledningens./ll=l,3,2
.villedninge6ns
.vil9lednin3ger./ll=l,3,2
.villednin3g2er
.vil9lei./ll=l,3,2
.vil4lei
.vil9leia./ll=l,3,2
.vill2e8ia
.vil9leian3de./ll=l,3,2
.villei9a4n
.villeia6nd
.villeian1de
.vil9lei7a6st./ll=l,3,2
.villei1ast
.vil9le8id./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leidd./ll=l,3,2
.villei6d1d
.vil9leidde./ll=l,3,2
.villeid1de
.vil9le2ide./ll=l,3,2
.villei1de
.vil9l6eie./ll=l,3,2
.ville2i9e
.vil9leie3de./ll=l,3,2
.villei2e5d
.villeie1de
.vil9leien3de./ll=l,3,2
.villei5en1de
.villei1e2n
.villei2e6nd
.vil9leier./ll=l,3,2
.vil9lei6es./ll=l,3,2
.villei6e1s
.vil9leiet./ll=l,3,2
.vill6ei1et
.vil9leiete./ll=l,3,2
.villei2e9te
.vil9leiing./ll=l,3,2
.vill4ei1i
.villei5in
.villeii2ng
.vil9leiinga./ll=l,3,2
.villeiin1ga
.vil9leiingane./ll=l,3,2
.villeiin9ga1ne
.vil9leiin9gar./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiin3gen./ll=l,3,2
.villeiin3g2en
.villeiin1ge
.vil9leiingens./ll=l,3,2
.villeiinge6ns
.vil9leiin3gi./ll=l,3,2
.villeiin1gi
.vil9leitt./ll=l,3,2
.vill6eit
.villei6tt
.visit9tid./tt=t,5,2
.vi1si
.vi3s2it
.visit4tid
.visi6tt
.visit1ti
.visit9tida./tt=t,5,2
.visitt2i2da
.visit9tid2en./tt=t,5,2
.visitt2iden
.visitti1de
.visit9tidene./tt=t,5,2
.visittide1ne
.visit9tidens./tt=t,5,2
.visittid2e6ns
.visit9tider./tt=t,5,2
.visittid2er
.visit9tidi./tt=t,5,2
.visitti1di
.vis9s6kap./ss=s,3,2
.vi2s1s
.vis1ska
.vitas9stilling./ss=s,5,2
.vita2s5s4
.vitas2s3t
.vitass1ti
.vitasst4il
.vitass4tillin
.vitassti2l1l
.vitasstil1li
.vitasstilli2ng
.volleybal9lag./ll=l,9,2
.1vol
.vo2l1l
.vol1le
.volley1
.volleybal4
.volley1b
.volley1b4a
.volleybal4lag
.vo2l1leyba2l1l
.volleybal9laga./ll=l,9,2
.volleyball4a4ga
.volleybal9lagene./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballa1ge
.volleyballag2en
.volleyballage1ne
.volleybal9la5get./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9lagets./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballa5ge4t5s1
.volleybal9lags./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballa8gs1
.volleybal9landskamp./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal4lan
.volleyball4an8ds
.volleyballa6nd
.volleyballand1ska
.volleyballand2s1kam
.volleyballandska2m1p
.volleybal9landskampen./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballandskam1pe
.volleybal9landskampene./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballandskampe1ne
.volleybal9landskampens./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballandskampe6ns
.volleybal9landskamper./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9landslag./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballands1l4
.volleybal9landslaga./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballandsl4a6ga
.volleybal9landslagene./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballandsla5ge
.volleyballandslag2en
.volleyballandslage1ne
.volleybal9landsla5get./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9landslagets./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballandsla5ge4t5s1
.volleybal9leder./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal4led
.vol1leybal1le
.volleyballe5d2er
.volleyballe1de
.volleybal9lede1re./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballede1re
.volleybal9lederen./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9lederens./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballedere6ns
.volleybal9lede1r2es./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9leder3ne./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballeder5ne
.volleyballed2e2rn
.volleybal9leder5n2es./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballederne1s2
.wat9timane./tt=t,3,2
.1wat
.wa6tt
.wat1ti
.watt4i1ma
.watti9man
.wattima3ne
.wat9ti5mar./tt=t,3,2
.wat9ti4me./tt=t,3,2
.watti1me
.wat9timen./tt=t,3,2
.wat9timene./tt=t,3,2
.wattime1ne
.wat9timer./tt=t,3,2
.øredob9behengt./bb=b,6,2
.ø2re1do
.øred8o2b3
.øredo2b1b
.øredob6be1h
.øredob1be
.øredobbehe2ng
.øredobbehen2g1t
.øredob9behengte./bb=b,6,2
.øredobbeheng9t6e
.øvrevol9løp./ll=l,7,2
.øvre1v
.øvre1vol
.øvrevol4løp
.øvrevo2l1l
.øvrevol1lø
.øvrevol9lø6pa./ll=l,7,2
.øvrevollø1pa
.øvrevol9løpene./ll=l,7,2
.øvrevollø1pe
.øvrevolløpe1ne
.øvrevol9løpet./ll=l,7,2
.øvrevol9løpets./ll=l,7,2
.øvrevolløpe4t1s6
.ålmen9nyt3ta./nn=n,5,2
.å2l1m
.ål1me
.ålm6e4nn
.ålmen4ny
.ålmenny4t
.ålmenn4y6tt
.ålmennyt5t6a
.ålmen9nyttane./nn=n,5,2
.ålmennyt5t6a1ne
.ålmen9nyt7t8ar./nn=n,5,2
.ålmen9nyt3te./nn=n,5,2
.ålmennyt1t4e
.ålmen9nyt5ten./nn=n,5,2
.ålmennyt3ten
.ålmen9nyt5tene./nn=n,5,2
.ålmennytte1ne
.ålmen9nyt5ter./nn=n,5,2
.ålmen9nyttig./nn=n,5,2
.ålmennyt5t2ig
.ålmennyt1ti
.ålmen9nytti7ga1re./nn=n,5,2
.ålmennytti1ga
.ålmennyttiga1re
.ålmen9nytti5ga6st./nn=n,5,2
.ålmen9nyttiga2s5te./nn=n,5,2
.ålmennyttigas5te
.ålmen9nytti9ge./nn=n,5,2
.ålmennytti1ge
.ålmen9nytto4ne./nn=n,5,2
.ålmennyt2t2on
.ålmennytto1ne
.ålmen9nytt4or./nn=n,5,2
